Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0616.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) âAllergan settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Allergan Pharmaceuticals. (b) âAlvogen settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Alvogen, Incorporated. (c) âAmneal settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Amneal Pharmaceuticals, LLC. (d) âApotex settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Apotex Corporation. (e) âCVS settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with CVS Pharmacy. (f) âDistributor settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with AmerisourceBergen Corporation, Cardinal Health, Inc., and McKesson Corporation. (g) âHikma settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Hikma Pharmaceuticals USA, Incorporated. (h) âIndivior settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Indivior, Incorporated. (i) âJanssen settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Janssen Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (j) âKroger settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with the Kroger Co. (k) âMDLâ means In re Natâl Prescription Opiate Litigation, multidistrict litigation consolidated in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Ohio, Case No. 1:17-MD-2804. (l) âMylan settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Viatris, Inc. (m) âPolitical subdivisionâ means a public body corporate in this state, an agency of a public body corporate in this state, a nonincorporated body in this state of whatever nature, or an agency of a nonincorporated body in this state. Political subdivision includes a county, city, village, township, school district, or special district or authority of this state. Political subdivision does not include this state. (n) âPurdue settlementâ means the Governmental Entity and Shareholder Direct Settlement Agreement in the bankruptcy action In re Purdue Pharma LP et al, Case No. 19-23649 (SHL) (Bankr SDNY), to which this state is a party. (o) âSun settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Sun Pharmaceuticals, Incorporated. (p) âTeva settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Teva Pharmaceuticals. (q) âWalgreens national settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Walgreens Pharmacy. (r) âWalmart settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Walmart. (s) âZydus settlementâ means the master settlement agreement arising out of the MDL and entered into by this state with Zydus Pharmaceuticals (USA), Inc. Sec. 3. A political subdivision of this state shall not commence or maintain an action as follows: (a) After January 1, 2021, an action related to the released claims as defined in the distributor settlement against the released entities as defined in the distributor settlement. (b) After January 1, 2021, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Janssen settlement against the released entities as defined in the Janssen settlement. (c) After January 1, 2022, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Allergan settlement against the released entities as defined in the Allergan settlement. (d) After January 1, 2022, an action related to the released claims as defined in the CVS settlement against the released entities as defined in the CVS settlement. (e) After January 1, 2022, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Teva settlement against the released entities as defined in the Teva settlement. (f) After January 1, 2022, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Walgreens national settlement against the released entities as defined in the Walgreens national settlement. (g) After January 1, 2022, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Walmart settlement against the released entities as defined in the Walmart settlement. (h) After January 1, 2024, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Kroger settlement against the released entities as defined in the Kroger settlement. (i) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the Shareholder Released Claims as defined in the Purdue settlement against the Shareholder Released Persons as defined in the Purdue settlement. (j) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Alvogen settlement against the released entities as defined in the Alvogen settlement. (k) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Amneal settlement against the released entities as defined in the Amneal settlement. (l) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Apotex settlement against the released entities as defined in the Apotex settlement. (m) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Hikma settlement against the released entities as defined in the Hikma settlement. (n) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Indivior settlement against the released entities as defined in the Indivior settlement. (o) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Mylan settlement against the released entities as defined in the Mylan settlement. (p) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Sun settlement against the released entities as defined in the Sun settlement. (q) After January 1, 2025, an action related to the released claims as defined in the Zydus settlement against the released entities as defined in the Zydus settlement. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor